trunk/apertium-es-ro/apertium-es-ro.ro.dix
<pardef n="co/rn__n">
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>rn</l>
	  <r>rn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>	
        <p>	  
	  <l>rnul</l>
	  <r>rn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>rn</l>
	  <r>rn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>rnului</l>
	  <r>rn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>arne</l>
	  <r>rn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>	  
	  <l>rnuri</l>
	  <r>rn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>arnele</l>
	  <r>rn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
	<p>	  
	  <l>rnurile</l>
	  <r>rn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>arne</l>
	  <r>rn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>	  
	  <l>rnuri</l>
	  <r>rn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>arnelor</l>
	  <r>rn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
	<p>	  
	  <l>rnurilor</l>
	  <r>rn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      </pardef>


<pardef n="timp__n">
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>	
        <p>	  
	  <l>ul</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>ului</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>uri</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>	  
	  <l>i</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>urile</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
	<p>	  
	  <l>ii</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>uri</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>	  
	  <l>i</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>urilor</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
	<p>	  
	  <l>ilor</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      </pardef>



  
<pardef n="cafe/a__n">
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>a</l>
	  <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>	
        <p>	  
	  <l>aua</l>
	  <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>le</l>
	  <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>lei</l>
	  <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>le</l>
	  <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>lele</l>
	  <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>le</l>
	  <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>lelor</l>
	  <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
   </pardef>

<pardef n="canoe__n">
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>	
        <p>	  
	  <l>a</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>i</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>le</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p> 
	  <l>lor</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
   </pardef>

<pardef n="fiic/ă__n">
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>ă</l>
	  <r>ă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>	
        <p>	  
	  <l>a</l>
	  <r>ă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r>ă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>ei</l>
	  <r>ă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r>ă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>ele</l>
	  <r>ă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r>ă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>elor</l>
	  <r>ă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
     </pardef>
     
 <pardef n="brânz/ă__n">
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>ă</l>
	  <r>ă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>	
        <p>	  
	  <l>a</l>
	  <r>ă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r>ă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>ei</l>
	  <r>ă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>eturi</l>
	  <r>ă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>eturile</l>
	  <r>ă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>eturi</l>
	  <r>ă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>eturilor</l>
	  <r>ă<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
     </pardef>
     
 <pardef n="marijuan/a__n">
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>ă</l>
	  <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>	
        <p>	  
	  <l>a</l>
	  <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>ei</l>
	  <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>ele</l>
	  <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>	  
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>	  
	  <l>elor</l>
	  <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
     </pardef>
     

<e lm="corn" a="mioara">
        <i>co</i>
        <par n="co/rn__n"/>
      </e>
<e lm="timp" a="mioara">
        <i>timp</i>
        <par n="timp__n"/>
      </e>
<e lm="canoe" a="delnou">
        <i>canoe</i>
        <par n="canoe__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="acadea" a="delnou">
        <i>acade</i>
        <par n="cafe/a__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="măsea">
        <i>măse</i>
        <par n="cafe/a__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="perdea">
        <i>perde</i>
        <par n="cafe/a__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="stea">
        <i>ste</i>
        <par n="cafe/a__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="tejghea" r="LR">
        <i>tejghe</i>
        <par n="cafe/a__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="șosea">
        <i>șose</i>
        <par n="cafe/a__n"/>
      </e>
<e lm="marijuana">
      <i>marijuan</i>
      <par n="marijuan/a__n"/>
    </e>
     <e lm="ikebana" a="delnou">
      <i>ikeban</i>
      <par n="marijuan/a__n"/>
    </e>
<e lm="brânză">
      <i>brânz</i>
      <par n="brânz/ă__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="călăuză">
      <i>călăuz</i>
      <par n="fiic/ă__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="armată">
      <i>armat</i>
      <par n="fiic/ă__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="conservă">
      <i>conserv</i>
      <par n="fiic/ă__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="gală">
      <i>gal</i>
      <par n="fiic/ă__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="normă">
      <i>norm</i>
      <par n="fiic/ă__n"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="tihnă">
      <i>tihn</i>
      <par n="fiic/ă__n"/>
    </e>
<e lm="șuviță" a="delia">
  <i>șuviț</i>
  <par n="fiic/ă__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="floricea" a="delia">
  <i>florice</i>
  <par n="cafe/a__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="vopsea" a="delia">
  <i>vopse</i>
  <par n="cafe/a__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="libră" a="mioara" r="LR">
  <i>libr</i>
  <par n="fiic/ă__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="bretea" a="delia">
  <i>brete</i>
  <par n="cafe/a__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="teză" a="delia">
  <i>tez</i>
  <par n="fiic/ă__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="catifea" a="delia">
  <i>catife</i>
  <par n="cafe/a__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="zăbrea" a="delia">
  <i>zăbre</i>
  <par n="cafe/a__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="zeflemea" a="delia">
  <i>zefleme</i>
  <par n="cafe/a__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="slană" a="delia">
  <i>slan</i>
  <par n="fiic/ă__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="soia" a="delia">
  <i>soi</i>
  <par n="marijuan/a__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="sincopă" a="delia">
  <i>sincop</i>
  <par n="fiic/ă__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="saltea" a="delia">
  <i>salte</i>
  <par n="cafe/a__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="curea" a="mioara" r="LR">
  <i>cure</i>
  <par n="cafe/a__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="lichea" a="mioara" r="LR">
  <i>liche</i>
  <par n="cafe/a__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="belea" a="mioara">
  <i>bele</i>
  <par n="cafe/a__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="zorea" a="mioara">
  <i>zore</i>
  <par n="cafe/a__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="pansea" a="mioara" r="LR">
  <i>panse</i>
  <par n="cafe/a__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="macrozonă" a="mioara">
  <i>macrozon</i>
  <par n="fiic/ă__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="izotermă" a="mioara">
  <i>izoterm</i>
  <par n="fiic/ă__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="reprezentanță" a="mioara" r="LR">
  <i>reprezentanț</i>
  <par n="fiic/ă__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="schismă" a="mioara">
  <i>schism</i>
  <par n="fiic/ă__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="ascită" a="mioara">
  <i>ascit</i>
  <par n="fiic/ă__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="raniță" a="delia">
  <i>raniț</i>
  <par n="fiic/ă__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="podea" a="delia">
  <i>pode</i>
  <par n="cafe/a__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="recunoștință" r="LR" a="delia">
  <i>recunoștinț</i>
  <par n="fiic/ă__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="lulea" a="delia">
  <i>lule</i>
  <par n="cafe/a__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="jambieră" a="delia">
  <i>jambier</i>
  <par n="fiic/ă__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="jaluzea" a="delia">
  <i>jaluze</i>
  <par n="cafe/a__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="fidea" a="delia">
  <i>fide</i>
  <par n="cafe/a__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="farsă" a="delia">
  <i>fars</i>
  <par n="fiic/ă__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="hidrocentrală" a="delnou">
  <i>hidrocentral</i>
  <par n="fiic/ă__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="canapea" a="delia">
  <i>canape</i>
  <par n="cafe/a__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="boccea" a="delia">
  <i>bocce</i>
  <par n="cafe/a__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="polivalență" a="mioara">
  <i>polivalenț</i>
  <par n="fiic/ă__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="creșă" a="delnou">
  <i>creș</i>
  <par n="fiic/ă__n"/>
</e>
